Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-906
Oil and gas; drilling permit; abandonment permit; fee.

(1) It shall be unlawful to commence operations for the drilling of a well for oil or gas without first giving to the commission notice of intention to drill, and without first obtaining a permit from the commission, under such rules and regulations as may be reasonably prescribed by the commission, and by paying to the commission a fee of two hundred dollars for each such permit.

(2) It shall be unlawful to commence operations for the abandonment of a well with production casing in the hole without first giving to the commission notice of intention to abandon and without first obtaining the approval of the commission for such abandonment and paying to the commission a fee of one hundred dollars.

Laws 1959, c. 262, § 6, p. 905;

Laws 1967, c. 353, § 1, p. 938;

Laws 1974, LB 804, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 407, § 1.

This section requires a permit from the Oil and Gas Conservation Commission before a well may be drilled. Farmers Irr. Dist. v. Schumacher, 187 Neb. 825, 194 N.W.2d 788 (1972).